Utah statutes.
17-18a-601.   Assistance to the attorney general.

(1) (a)  The attorney shall appear and assist the attorney general in criminal and civil legal matters involving the state if:

(i)  except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), the attorney general requests assistance; or

(ii)  the attorney is required by law to provide assistance.

(b)  The attorney is not required to provide, if requested, the attorney general assistance if the attorney's assistance would:

(i)  interfere with the attorney's duties and responsibilities to the county; or

(ii)  create a conflict of interest.

(c)  The attorney shall cooperate with the attorney general in an investigation, including an investigation described in Section 67-5-18.

(2)  The attorney general shall assist the attorney with a criminal prosecution if a court:

(a)  finds that the attorney is unable to satisfactorily and adequately perform the duties of prosecuting a criminal case; and

(b)  recommends that the attorney seek additional legal assistance.



Enacted by Chapter 237, 2013 General Session

